Missouri, session 2026, SB1747.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 285.625, 285.630, 285.635, 285.650,
285.670, 407.1095, 407.1098, 407.1101, 407.1104, 455.030,
455.050, 455.523, 565.076, 565.090, 565.091, 565.227, 571.070,
589.660, 589.663, and 590.040, RSMo, are repealed and thirty
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
27.117, 285.625, 285.630, 285.635, 285.650, 285.670, 407.1095,
407.1098, 407.1101, 407.1104, 407.1115, 455.030, 455.050,
455.523, 565.076, 565.090, 565.091, 565.227, 565.260, 565.400,
565.405, 571.070, 573.570, 573.575, 589.660, 589.663, 590.040,
595.205, 595.400, and 595.450, to read as follows:
27.117. The attorney general shall have concurrent
jurisdiction with any and all prosecuting attorneys to
prosecute persons in violation of sections 565.090, 565.091,
565.225, 565.227, 565.400, 565.405, 573.570, or 573.575,
where the offense occurred in more than one jurisdiction of
the state.
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1747 2
285.625. As used in sections 285.625 to 285.670, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Abuse", the same meaning as in section 210.110;
(2) "Cyberharassment", a purposeful or knowing course
of conduct using digital technology, internet service
providers, electronic service providers, or other electronic
communications and devices to cause reasonable fear, alarm,
anxiety, undo stress, or terror to others by repeated
contact with no legitimate purpose. This course of conduct
is threatening, aggressive, or otherwise fear-inducing and
involves an invasion of a person's relative right to privacy
and manifests in repeated actions over time;
(3) "Cyberstalking", a purposeful or knowing course of
conduct using digital technology, internet service
providers, electronic service providers, or other electronic
communications and devices to enhance the ability to
intimidate, track, follow, or cause reasonable fear, alarm,
anxiety, undo stress, or terror to another person. This
course of conduct is threatening, aggressive, or otherwise
fear-inducing and involves an invasion of a person's
relative right to privacy and manifests in repeated actions
over time;
(4) "Director", the director of the department of
labor and industrial relations;
[(3)] (5) "Domestic violence", the same meaning as in
section 455.010;
[(4)] (6) "Employ", the act of employing or state of
being employed, engaged, or hired to perform work or
services of any kind or character within the state of
Missouri;

SB 1747 3
[(5)] (7) "Employee", any person performing work or
service of any kind or character for hire within the state
of Missouri;
[(6)] (8) "Employer", the state or any agency of the
state, political subdivision of the state, or any person
that employs at least twenty employees;
[(7)] (9) "Employee benefit plan" or "plan", an
employee welfare benefit plan or an employee pension benefit
plan or a plan that is both an employee welfare benefit plan
and an employee pension benefit plan;
[(8)] (10) "Employment benefits", all benefits
provided or made available to employees by an employer,
including life insurance, health insurance, disability
insurance, sick leave, annual leave, educational benefits,
pensions, and profit-sharing, regardless of whether such
benefits are provided by a practice or written policy of an
employer or through an employee benefit plan;
[(9)] (11) "Family or household member", for employees
with a family or household member who is a victim of
domestic or sexual violence, a spouse, parent, son,
daughter, other person related by blood or by present or
prior marriage, other person who shares a relationship
through a son or daughter, and persons jointly residing in
the same household;
(12) "Harassment", engaging in a purposeful or knowing
course of conduct involving more than one incident that
alarms or causes distress to an adult or child and serves no
legitimate purpose. The course of conduct shall be such as
would cause a reasonable adult or child to suffer
substantial emotional distress and shall actually cause
substantial emotional distress to the petitioner or child.
Such conduct shall include, but is not limited to:

SB 1747 4
(a) Following another about in a public place or
places;
(b) Peering in the window or lingering outside the
residence of another, but does not include constitutionally
protected activity;
[(10)] (13) "Parent", the biological parent of an
employee or an individual who stood in loco parentis to an
employee when the employee was a son or daughter who is a
victim of domestic or sexual violence;
[(11)] (14) "Person", an individual, partnership,
association, corporation, business trust, legal
representative, or any organized group of persons;
[(12)] (15) "Public agency", the government of the
state or of any political subdivision thereof, any agency of
the state or of any political subdivision of the state, or
any other governmental agency;
[(13)] (16) "Public assistance", includes cash, food
stamps, medical assistance, housing assistance, and other
benefits provided on the basis of income by a public agency
or public employer;
[(14)] (17) "Qualified individual", in the case of:
(a) An applicant or employee of an employer, an
individual who, but for being a victim of domestic or sexual
violence or with a family or household member who is a
victim of domestic or sexual violence, cyberharassment,
cyberstalking, harassment, or stalking, can perform the
essential functions of the employment position that such
individual holds or desires; or
(b) An applicant for or recipient of public assistance
from a public agency, an individual who, but for being a
victim of domestic or sexual violence, cyberharassment,
cyberstalking, harassment, or stalking, or with a family or

SB 1747 5
household member who is a victim of domestic or sexual
violence, cyberharassment, cyberstalking, harassment, or
stalking, can satisfy the essential requirements of the
program providing the public assistance that the individual
receives or desires;
100 [(15)] (18) "Reasonable safety accommodation", an
101 adjustment to a job structure, workplace facility, or work
102 requirement, including a transfer, reassignment, modified
103 schedule, leave, a changed telephone number or seating
104 assignment, installation of a lock, implementation of a
105 safety procedure, or assistance in documenting domestic
106 violence that occurs at the workplace or in work-related
107 settings, in response to actual or threatened domestic
108 violence. Any exigent circumstances or danger facing the
109 employee or his or her family or household member shall be
110 considered in determining whether the accommodation is
111 reasonable;
112 [(16)] (19) "Reduced work schedule", a work schedule
113 that reduces the usual number of hours per workweek, or
114 hours per workday, of an employee;
115 [(17)] (20) "Sexual violence", a sexual assault, as
116 defined in section 455.010, and trafficking for the purposes
117 of sexual exploitation as described in section 566.209;
118 [(18)] (21) "Son or daughter", a biological, adopted,
119 or foster child, a stepchild, a legal ward, or a child of a
120 person standing in loco parentis, who is under eighteen
121 years of age, or is eighteen years of age or older and
122 incapable of self-care because of a mental or physical
123 disability and is a victim of domestic or sexual violence;
124 (22) "Stalking", an unwanted course of conduct that
125 causes alarm to another person, or a person who resides
126 together in the same household with the person seeking the

SB 1747 6
127 order of protection when it is reasonable in that person's
128 situation to have been alarmed by the conduct. As used in
129 this subdivision, "alarm" shall mean fear of danger of
130 physical harm and "course of conduct" shall mean two or more
131 acts that serve no legitimate purpose including, but not
132 limited to, acts in which the stalker directly, indirectly,
133 or through a third party follows, monitors, observes,
134 surveils, threatens, or communicates to a person by any
135 action, method, or device;
136 [(19)] (23) "Undue hardship", significant difficulty
137 or expense, when considered in light of the nature and cost
138 of the reasonable safety accommodation;
139 [(20)] (24) "Victim of domestic or sexual violence",
140 an individual who has been subjected to domestic violence,
141 sexual violence, or abuse;
142 [(21)] (25) "Victim services organization", a
143 nonprofit, nongovernmental organization that provides
144 assistance to victims of domestic violence or to advocates
145 for such victims, including a rape crisis center, a child
146 advocacy center, an organization carrying out a domestic
147 violence program, an organization operating a shelter or
148 providing counseling services, or a legal services
149 organization or other organization providing assistance
150 through the legal process;
151 [(22)] (26) "Work", any job, task, labor, services, or
152 any other activity for which compensation is provided,
153 expected, or due.
285.630. 1. An employee who is a victim of domestic
or sexual violence, cyberharassment, cyberstalking,
harassment, or stalking or a family or household member who
is a victim of domestic or sexual violence, cyberharassment,
cyberstalking, harassment, or stalking whose interests are

SB 1747 7
not adverse to the employee as it relates to the domestic or
sexual violence, cyberharassment, cyberstalking, harassment,
or stalking may take unpaid leave from work to address such
violence by:
(1) Seeking medical attention for, or recovering from,
physical or psychological injuries caused by domestic or
sexual violence, cyberharassment, cyberstalking, harassment,
or stalking to the employee or the employee's family or
household member;
(2) Obtaining services from a victim services
organization for the employee or the employee's family or
household member;
(3) Obtaining psychological or other counseling for
the employee or the employee's family or household member;
(4) Participating in safety planning, temporarily or
permanently relocating, or taking other actions to increase
the safety of the employee or the employee's family or
household member from future domestic or sexual violence,
cyberharassment, cyberstalking, harassment, or stalking or
to ensure economic security; or
(5) Seeking legal assistance or remedies to ensure the
health and safety of the employee or the employee's family
or household member, including preparing for or
participating in any civil or criminal legal proceeding
related to or derived from domestic or sexual violence,
cyberharassment, cyberstalking, harassment, or stalking.
2. Subject to subsection 5 of this section, an
employee working for an employer that employs at least fifty
employees shall be entitled to a total of two workweeks of
leave under subsection 1 of this section during any twelve-
month period. An employee working for an employer that
employs at least twenty but not more than forty-nine

SB 1747 8
employees shall be entitled to a total of one workweek of
leave under subsection 1 of this section during any twelve-
month period. For purposes of this subsection "workweek"
shall mean an individual employee's standard workweek. The
total number of workweeks to which an employee is entitled
shall not decrease during the relevant twelve-month period.
Sections 285.625 to 285.670 shall not create a right for an
employee to take unpaid leave that exceeds the amount of
unpaid leave time allowed under the federal Family and
Medical Leave Act of 1993 (29 U.S.C. Section 2601 et seq.).
3. Leave described in subsection 2 of this section may
be taken intermittently or on a reduced work schedule.
4. The employee shall provide the employer with at
least forty-eight hours' advance notice of the employee's
intention to take leave under subsection 1 of this section,
unless providing such notice is not practicable. When an
unscheduled absence occurs, the employer may not take any
action against the employee if the employee, upon request of
the employer and within a reasonable period after the
absence, provides certification under subsection 5 of this
section.
5. The employer may require the employee to provide
certification to the employer that the employee or the
employee's family or household member is a victim of
domestic or sexual violence, cyberharassment, cyberstalking,
harassment, or stalking and that the leave is for one of the
purposes enumerated in subsection 1 of this section. The
employee shall provide such certification to the employer
within a reasonable period after the employer requests
certification.
6. An employee may satisfy the certification
requirement of subsection 5 of this section by providing to

SB 1747 9
the employer a sworn statement of the employee and the
following:
(1) Documentation from an employee, agent, or
volunteer of a victim services organization, an attorney, a
member of the clergy, or a medical or other professional
from whom the employee or the employee's family or household
member has sought assistance in addressing domestic violence
or sexual violence, cyberharassment, cyberstalking,
harassment, or stalking and the effects of such violence;
(2) A police or court record; or
(3) Other corroborating evidence.
7. All information provided to the employer pursuant
to subsection 6 of this section including a statement of the
employee or any other documentation, record, or
corroborating evidence, and the fact that the employee has
requested or obtained leave pursuant to this section, shall
be retained in the strictest confidence by the employer,
except to the extent that disclosure is requested or
consented to in writing by the employee or otherwise
required by applicable federal or state law.
8. Any employee who takes leave under this section
shall be entitled, on return from such leave, to be restored
by the employer to the position of employment held by the
employee when the leave commenced or an equivalent position
with equivalent employment benefits, pay, and other terms
and conditions of employment.
9. The taking of leave under this section shall not
result in the loss of any employment benefit accrued prior
to the date on which the leave commenced. Nothing in this
section shall be construed to entitle any restored employee
100 to the accrual of any seniority or employment benefits
101 during any period of leave or any right, benefit, or

SB 1747 10
102 position of employment other than any right, benefit, or
103 position to which the employee would have been entitled had
104 the employee not taken the leave. Nothing in this section
105 shall be construed to prohibit an employer from requiring an
106 employee on leave under this section to report periodically
107 to the employer on the status and intention of the employee
108 to return to work.
109 10. Any employee who reports, seeks help, or needs
110 extended privacy measures to ensure safety from domestic or
111 sexual violence, cyberharassment, cyberstalking, harassment,
112 or stalking shall not be subject to eviction, harassment,
113 dismissal, or retaliation by an employer.
114 11. Upon the request of an employer, an employee
115 requesting a reasonable safety accommodation pursuant to
116 sections 285.625 to 285.670 shall provide the employer a
117 written statement signed by the employee or an individual
118 acting on the employee's behalf, certifying that the
119 reasonable safety accommodation is for a purpose authorized
120 under sections 285.625 to 285.670.
285.635. 1. During any period that an employee takes
leave under section 285.630, the employer shall maintain
coverage for the employee and any family or household member
under any group health plan for the duration of such leave
at the level and under the conditions coverage would have
been provided if the employee had continued in employment
continuously for the duration of such leave.
2. The employer may recover from the employee the
premium that the employer paid for maintaining coverage for
the employee and the employee's family or household member
under such group health plan during any period of leave
under this section if the employee fails to return from
leave after the period of leave to which the employee is

SB 1747 11
entitled has expired for a reason other than the
continuation, recurrence, or onset of domestic violence,
sexual violence, abuse, a sexual assault, cyberharassment,
cyberstalking, harassment, or stalking or human trafficking
that entitled the employee to leave under section 285.630,
or other circumstances beyond the control of the employee.
3. An employer may require an employee who claims that
the employee is unable to return to work because of a reason
described in subsection 2 of this section to provide, within
a reasonable period after making the claim, certification to
the employer that the employee is unable to return to work
because of that reason by providing the employer with:
(1) A sworn statement of the employee;
(2) Documentation from an employee, agent, or
volunteer of a victim services organization, an attorney, a
member of the clergy, or a medical or other professional
from whom the employee has sought assistance in addressing
domestic or sexual violence, cyberharassment, cyberstalking,
harassment, or stalking and the effects of such violence;
(3) A police or court record; or
(4) Other corroborating evidence.
4. All information provided to the employer pursuant
to subsection 3 of this section including a statement of the
employee or any other documentation, record, or
corroborating evidence, and the fact that the employee is
not returning to work because of a reason described in
subsection 2 of this section shall be retained in the
strictest confidence by the employer, except to the extent
that disclosure is requested or consented to in writing by
the employee, or otherwise required by applicable federal or
state law.

SB 1747 12
285.650. 1. Employers and public agencies shall make
reasonable safety accommodations, in a timely manner, to the
known limitations resulting from circumstances relating to
being a victim of domestic or sexual violence,
cyberharassment, cyberstalking, harassment, or stalking or a
family or household member being a victim of domestic or
sexual violence, cyberharassment, cyberstalking, harassment,
or stalking of an otherwise qualified individual:
(1) Who is:
(a) An employee of the employer; or
(b) An applicant for or recipient of public assistance
from a public agency; and
(2) Who is:
(a) A victim of domestic or sexual violence,
cyberharassment, cyberstalking, harassment, or stalking; or
(b) With a family or household member who is a victim
of domestic or sexual violence, cyberharassment,
cyberstalking, harassment, or stalking whose interests are
not adverse to the individual in this subdivision as it
relates to the domestic violence, sexual violence, [or]
abuse, cyberharassment, cyberstalking, harassment, or
stalking;
2. Subsection 1 of this section shall not apply if the
employer or public agency can demonstrate that the
accommodation would impose an undue hardship on the
operation of the employer or public agency.
285.670. 1. Nothing in sections 285.625 to 285.670
shall be construed to supersede any provision of any
federal, state, or local law, collective bargaining
agreement, or employment benefits program or plan that
provides:

SB 1747 13
(1) Greater leave benefits for victims of domestic or
sexual violence, cyberharassment, cyberstalking, harassment,
or stalking than the rights established under sections
285.625 to 285.670; or
(2) Leave benefits for a larger population of victims
of domestic or sexual violence, as defined in such law,
agreement, program, or plan, than the victims of domestic or
sexual violence, cyberharassment, cyberstalking, harassment,
or stalking covered under sections 285.625 to 285.670.
2. The rights and remedies established for applicants
and employees who are victims of domestic or sexual
violence, cyberharassment, cyberstalking, harassment, or
stalking and applicants and employees with a family or
household member who is a victim of domestic or sexual
violence, cyberharassment, cyberstalking, harassment, or
stalking under sections 285.625 to 285.670 shall not be
diminished by any federal, state, or local law, collective
bargaining agreement, or employment benefits program or plan.
407.1095. As used in sections 407.1095 to 407.1110,
the following words and phrases mean:
(1) "Business subscriber", a person or entity that,
for business use, has subscribed to telephone service,
wireless service, or other similar service;
(2) "Call spoofing", the practice by a calling party
or any caller identification service of knowingly
transmitting misleading or inaccurate caller identification
information with the intent to deceive, defraud, cause harm,
harass, mislead, or wrongfully obtain anything of value;
(3) "Caller identification service", a type of
telephone service which permits telephone subscribers to see
the telephone number of incoming telephone calls;

SB 1747 14
[(2)] (4) "Residential subscriber", a person who, for
[primarily] personal and familial use, has subscribed to
residential telephone service, wireless service or similar
service, or the other persons living or residing with such
person;
[(3)] (5) "Seller", the same as defined in section
407.1070;
(6) "Telemarketer", the same as defined in section
407.1070;
(7) "Telephone solicitation", any voice, facsimile,
short messaging service (SMS), or multimedia messaging
service (MMS), for the purpose of encouraging the purchase
or rental of, or investment in, property, goods or services,
or soliciting donations of money, property, goods, or
services, but does not include communications:
(a) To any business subscriber or residential
subscriber with that subscriber's prior express invitation
or permission;
(b) By or on behalf of any person or entity with whom
a business subscriber or residential subscriber has had a
business contact within the past one hundred eighty days or
a current business or personal relationship;
(c) By or on behalf of an entity organized pursuant to
Chapter 501 (c)(3) of the United States Internal Revenue
Code, while such entity is engaged in [fund-raising]
fundraising to support the charitable purpose for which the
entity was established provided that a bona fide member of
such exempt organization makes the voice communication;
(d) By or on behalf of any entity over which a federal
agency has regulatory authority to the extent that:
a. Subject to such authority, the entity is required
to maintain a license, permit or certificate to sell or

SB 1747 15
provide the merchandise being offered through telemarketing;
and
b. The entity is required by law or rule to develop
and maintain a no-call list[;
(e) By a natural person responding to a referral, or
working from his or her primary residence, or a person
licensed by the state of Missouri to carry out a trade,
occupation or profession who is setting or attempting to set
an appointment for actions relating to that licensed trade,
occupation or profession within the state or counties
contiguous to the state].
407.1098. No person or entity shall make or cause to
be made any telephone solicitation, including via call
spoofing, to any business subscriber or residential
subscriber in this state who has given notice to the
attorney general, in accordance with rules promulgated
pursuant to section 407.1101 of such subscriber's objection
to receiving telephone solicitations.
407.1101. 1. The attorney general shall establish and
provide for the operation of a database to compile a list of
telephone numbers of business subscribers and residential
subscribers who object to receiving telephone
solicitations. [Such list is not intended to include any
telephone number primarily used for business or commercial
purposes.]
2. The attorney general shall promulgate rules and
regulations governing the establishment of a state no-call
database as he or she deems necessary and appropriate to
fully implement the provisions of sections 407.1095 to
407.1110. The rules and regulations shall include those
which:

SB 1747 16
(1) Specify the methods by which each business
subscriber or residential subscriber may give notice to the
attorney general or its contractor of his or her objection
to receiving such solicitations or revocation of such
notice. There shall be no cost to the subscriber for
joining the database;
(2) Specify the length of time for which a notice of
objection shall be effective and the effect of a change of
telephone number on such notice;
(3) Specify the methods by which such objections and
revocations shall be collected and added to the database;
(4) Specify that once a person gives notice of
objection, the person shall not have to renew his or her
objection;
(5) Specify the methods by which any person or entity
desiring to make telephone solicitations will obtain access
to the database as required to avoid calling the telephone
numbers of business subscribers or residential subscribers
included in the database, including the cost assessed to
that person or entity for access to the database; and
[(5)] (6) Specify such other matters relating to the
database that the attorney general deems desirable.
3. If the Federal Communications Commission
establishes a single national database of telephone numbers
of subscribers who object to receiving telephone
solicitations pursuant to 47 U.S.C. Section 227(c)(3), the
attorney general shall include that part of such single
national database that relates to Missouri in the database
established pursuant to this section.
4. Information contained in the database established
pursuant to this section shall be used only for the purpose
of compliance with section 407.1098 and this section or in a

SB 1747 17
proceeding or action pursuant to section 407.1107. Such
information shall not be considered a public record pursuant
to chapter 610.
5. In April, July, October and January of each year,
the attorney general shall be encouraged to obtain
subscription listings of business subscribers and
residential subscribers in this state who have arranged to
be included on any national do-not-call list and add those
telephone numbers to the state do-not-call list.
6. The attorney general may utilize moneys
appropriated from general revenue and moneys appropriated
from the merchandising practices revolving fund established
in section 407.140 for the purposes of establishing and
operating the state no-call database.
7. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in sections 407.1095 to 407.1110 shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
the effective date or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2000, shall be invalid and void.
407.1104. 1. Any person or entity who makes a
telephone solicitation to any business subscriber or
residential subscriber in this state shall, at the beginning
of such solicitation, state clearly the identity of the
person or entity initiating the solicitation.

SB 1747 18
2. No person or entity who makes a telephone
solicitation to a business subscriber or residential
subscriber in this state shall knowingly use any method,
including call spoofing, to block or otherwise circumvent
any subscriber's use of a caller identification service.
407.1115. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Caller ID Anti-Spoofing Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Automatic telephone dialing system", equipment
that has the capacity to:
(a) Store or produce telephone numbers to be called,
using a random or sequential number generator; and
(b) Dial such numbers;
(2) "Call", any telephone call, facsimile, or text
message made using a public switched telephone network,
wireless cellular telephone service, or voice-over-internet
protocol (VoIP) service that has the capability of accessing
users on the public switched telephone network or a
successor network;
(3) "Caller", a person or entity who places a call,
facsimile, or text message, whether by phone or computer;
(4) "Caller identification information", information
provided by a caller identification service regarding the
telephone number or other origination information of a call
or facsimile transmission made using a telecommunications
service or an interconnected VoIP service or of a text
message sent using a text messaging service;
(5) "Caller identification service", any service or
device designed to provide the user of the service or device
with the telephone number or other origination information
of a call or facsimile transmission made using a
telecommunications service or an interconnected VoIP service

SB 1747 19
or of a text message sent using a text messaging service.
"Caller identification service" includes automatic number
identification services;
(6) "Provider", a telecommunication company that
provides voice communication services to customers in this
state;
(7) "Robocall", a call made, including a text message
sent, to any telephone number owned by a person or entity in
the state using an automatic telephone dialing system or an
artificial or prerecorded voice;
(8) "STIR/SHAKEN" or the "Secure Telephone Identity
Revisited (STIR) and Signature-based Handling of Asserted
Information Using toKENs (SHAKEN)", an authentication
framework of interconnected standards adopted by the Federal
Communications Commission. "STIR/SHAKEN" digitally
validates the handoff of phone calls passing through the
complex web of networks, allowing the phone company of the
consumer receiving the call to verify that a call is in fact
from the number displayed on Caller ID;
(9) "Text message":
(a) A real-time or near real-time message consisting
of text, images, sounds, or other information that is
transmitted from or received by a device that is identified
as the transmitting or receiving device by means of a
telephone number;
(b) Includes a short message service (SMS) message, an
enhanced message service (EMS) message, and a multimedia
message service (MMS) message; and
(c) Does not include a real-time, two-way voice or
video communication;
(10) "Text messaging service", a service that permits
the transmission or receipt of a text message, including a

SB 1747 20
service provided as part of or in connection with a
telecommunications service or an interconnected VoIP service;
(11) "Voice service", any service that is
interconnected with the public switched telephone network
and that furnishes voice communications to an end user using
resources from the North American Numbering Plan or any
successor to the North American Numbering Plan adopted by
the public service commission under the Communications Act
of 1934, 47 U.S.C. Section 251(e)(1), as amended; and
includes:
(a) Transmissions from a telephone facsimile machine,
computer, or other device to a telephone facsimile machine;
and
(b) Without limitation, any service that enables real-
time, two-way voice communications, including any service
that requires internet protocol-compatible customer premises
equipment (commonly known as "CPE") and permits outbound
calling, whether the service is one-way or two-way voice
over internet protocol.
3. Consistent with authorization provided by federal
law and rules of the Federal Communications Commission or
its successors:
(1) Providers shall block a voice call when the
subscriber to which the originating number is assigned has
requested that calls purporting to originate from that
number be blocked because the number is used for inbound
calls only; and
(2) Providers shall block calls originating from the
following numbers:
(a) A number that is not a valid North American
numbering plan number;

SB 1747 21
(b) A valid North American numbering plan number that
is not allocated to a provider by the North American
numbering plan administrator; and
(c) A valid North American numbering plan number that
is allocated to a provider by the North American number plan
administrator or pooling administrator, but is unused, so
long as the provider blocking the calls is the allocatee of
the number and confirms that the number is unused or has
obtained verification from the allocatee that the number is
100 unused at the time of the blocking.
101 4. Consistent with the authorization provided by
102 federal law and rules of the Federal Communications
103 Commission or its successors:
104 (1) Providers shall not block a voice call if the call
105 is an emergency call placed to 911; and
106 (2) Providers shall not block a voice call to a
107 subscriber who has requested that no inbound calls be
108 blocked.
109 5. For purposes of blocking calls from certain
110 originating numbers as authorized in subsections 3 and 4 of
111 this section, a provider may rely on caller identification
112 service information to determine the originating number.
113 6. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
114 contrary, a voice service provider shall be considered to be
115 in compliance with this section and any rule or regulation
116 adopted thereunder if that provider has filed a
117 certification with the Federal Communications Commission
118 that the provider's traffic is either authenticated with
119 STIR/SHAKEN or subject to a compliant robocall mitigation
120 program. A copy of such certification shall be made
121 available to the attorney general upon request.

SB 1747 22
122 7. No later than August 28, 2027, a provider of voice
123 service shall implement STIR/SHAKEN authentication protocol
124 or an alternative technology that provides comparable or
125 superior capability to verify and authenticate caller
126 identification in the internet protocol networks of voice
127 service providers.
128 8. (1) Any voice service provider that knowingly
129 fails or neglects to comply with this section, or a rule or
130 regulation adopted thereunder, shall be subject to the
131 payment of fines as follows:
132 (a) A sum of twenty-five thousand dollars for the
133 first offense;
134 (b) A sum of fifty thousand dollars for the second
135 offense; and
136 (c) A sum of seventy-five thousand dollars for the
137 third or any subsequent offense.
138 (2) All fines collected by the attorney general under
139 this section shall be deposited into the state treasury to
140 be credited to the merchandising practices revolving fund
141 created under section 407.140.
142 9. The attorney general has jurisdiction to commence
143 an action on behalf of the state of Missouri for any
144 violations under this section in a court of competent
145 jurisdiction. The court may, upon notice to the defendant
146 of not less than five days, grant injunctive relief to
147 enjoin and restrain the continuation of any violations, and
148 for the enforcement and collection of the fines under
149 subsection 8 of this section.
150 10. It shall be a violation of this section for a
151 caller to:
152 (1) Enter or cause to be entered false information
153 into a caller identification service with the malicious

SB 1747 23
154 intent to deceive, defraud, cause harm, harass, mislead, or
155 wrongfully obtain anything of value from the recipient of a
156 call; or
157 (2) Place a call knowing that false information was
158 entered into the caller identification service with the
159 intent to deceive, defraud, cause harm, harass, mislead, or
160 wrongfully obtain anything of value from the recipient of
161 the call.
162 11. This section shall not apply to:
163 (1) The blocking of caller identification information;
164 (2) Any law enforcement agency of the federal, state,
165 county, or municipal government;
166 (3) Any intelligence or security agency of the federal
167 government; or
168 (4) A communications service provider, including a
169 telecommunications, broadband, or voice-over-internet
170 service provider that:
171 (a) Acts in the communications service provider's
172 capacity as an intermediary for the transmission of
173 telephone service between the caller and the recipient;
174 (b) Provides or configures a service or service
175 feature as requested by the customer;
176 (c) Acts in a manner that is authorized or required by
177 applicable law; or
178 (d) Engages in other conduct that is necessary to
179 provide service.
180 12. The recipient of any call in which the caller uses
181 false caller identification information shall have standing
182 to recover actual and punitive damages against the caller.
183 Punitive damages shall be in an amount determined by the
184 court but not to exceed five thousand dollars per call.
185 Call recipients may bring action under this section as

SB 1747 24
186 members of a class. The attorney general may initiate legal
187 proceedings or intervene in legal proceedings on behalf of
188 call recipients and, if the caller is found guilty, shall
189 recover all costs of the investigation and prosecution of
190 the action.
191 13. It shall be unlawful for any person within the
192 United States, or any person outside the United States if
193 the recipient is within the United States, in connection
194 with any voice service or text messaging service, to cause
195 any caller identification service to knowingly transmit
196 misleading or inaccurate caller identification information
197 with the intent to deceive, defraud, cause harm, harass,
198 mislead, or wrongfully obtain anything of value, unless such
199 transmission is exempted under subsection 11 of this section.
455.030. 1. When the court is unavailable after
business hours or on holidays or weekends, a verified
petition for protection from domestic violence or a motion
for hearing on violation of any order of protection under
sections 455.010 to 455.085 may be filed before any
available court in the city or county having jurisdiction to
hear the petition pursuant to the guidelines developed
pursuant to subsection 4 of this section. An ex parte order
may be granted pursuant to section 455.035.
2. All papers in connection with the filing of a
petition or the granting of an ex parte order of protection
or a motion for a hearing on a violation of an order of
protection under this section shall be certified by such
court or the clerk within the next regular business day to
the circuit court having jurisdiction to hear the petition.
3. A petitioner seeking a protection order shall not
be required to reveal any current address or place of
residence except to the court in camera for the purpose of

SB 1747 25
determining jurisdiction and venue. The petitioner may be
required to provide a mailing address unless the petitioner
alleges that he or she would be endangered by such
disclosure, or that other family or household members would
be endangered by such disclosure. Effective January 1,
2004, a petitioner shall not be required to provide his or
her Social Security number on any petition or document filed
in connection with a protection order; except that, the
court may require that a petitioner's Social Security number
be retained on a confidential case sheet or other
confidential record maintained in conjunction with the
administration of the case.
4. The supreme court shall develop guidelines which
ensure that a verified petition may be filed on holidays,
evenings and weekends.
5. The supreme court shall develop guidelines for
redaction of personal identifying information where a
petitioner is required to reveal such information to the
court.
455.050. 1. Any full or ex parte order of protection
granted pursuant to sections 455.010 to 455.085 shall be to
protect the petitioner from cyberstalking, domestic
violence, stalking, or sexual assault and may include such
terms as the court reasonably deems necessary to ensure the
petitioner's safety, including but not limited to:
(1) Temporarily enjoining the respondent from
committing or threatening to commit cyberstalking, domestic
violence, molesting, stalking, sexual assault, or disturbing
the peace of the petitioner, including violence against a
pet;

SB 1747 26
(2) Temporarily enjoining the respondent from entering
the premises of the dwelling unit of the petitioner when the
dwelling unit is:
(a) Jointly owned, leased or rented or jointly
occupied by both parties; or
(b) Owned, leased, rented or occupied by petitioner
individually; or
(c) Jointly owned, leased, rented or occupied by
petitioner and a person other than respondent; provided,
however, no spouse shall be denied relief pursuant to this
section by reason of the absence of a property interest in
the dwelling unit; or
(d) Jointly occupied by the petitioner and a person
other than respondent; provided that the respondent has no
property interest in the dwelling unit; or
(3) Temporarily enjoining the respondent from
communicating with the petitioner in any manner or through
any medium.
2. Mutual orders of protection are prohibited unless
both parties have properly filed written petitions and
proper service has been made in accordance with sections
455.010 to 455.085.
3. When the court has, after a hearing for any full
order of protection, issued an order of protection, it may,
in addition:
(1) Award custody of any minor child born to or
adopted by the parties when the court has jurisdiction over
such child and no prior order regarding custody is pending
or has been made, and the best interests of the child
require such order be issued;
(2) Establish a visitation schedule that is in the
best interests of the child;

SB 1747 27
(3) Award child support in accordance with supreme
court rule 88.01 and chapter 452;
(4) Award maintenance to petitioner when petitioner
and respondent are lawfully married in accordance with
chapter 452;
(5) Order respondent to make or to continue to make
rent or mortgage payments on a residence occupied by the
petitioner if the respondent is found to have a duty to
support the petitioner or other dependent household members;
(6) Order the respondent to pay the petitioner's rent
at a residence other than the one previously shared by the
parties if the respondent is found to have a duty to support
the petitioner and the petitioner requests alternative
housing;
(7) Order that the petitioner be given temporary
possession of specified personal property, such as
automobiles, checkbooks, keys, and other personal effects;
(8) Prohibit the respondent from transferring,
encumbering, or otherwise disposing of specified property
mutually owned or leased by the parties;
(9) Order the respondent to participate in a court-
approved counseling program designed to help batterers stop
violent behavior or to participate in a substance abuse
treatment program;
(10) Order the respondent to pay a reasonable fee for
housing and other services that have been provided or that
are being provided to the petitioner by a shelter for
victims of domestic violence;
(11) Order the respondent to pay court costs;
(12) Order the respondent to pay the cost of medical
treatment and services that have been provided or that are
being provided to the petitioner as a result of injuries

SB 1747 28
sustained to the petitioner by an act of domestic violence
committed by the respondent;
(13) Award possession and care of any pet, along with
any moneys necessary to cover medical costs that may have
resulted from abuse of the pet.
4. (1) If the court issues, after a hearing for any
full order of protection, an order of protection, the court
may also:
(a) Prohibit the respondent from knowingly possessing
or purchasing any firearm while the order is in effect; and
(b) Inform the respondent of such prohibition in
writing and, if the respondent is present, orally; and
(2) If the court prohibits the respondent from
possessing or purchasing any firearm pursuant to subdivision
(1) of this subsection, the court shall forward the order to
the Missouri state highway patrol so that the Missouri state
highway patrol can update the respondent's record in the
National Instant Criminal Background Check System (NICS).
Upon receiving an order under this subsection, the Missouri
state highway patrol shall notify the Federal Bureau of
Investigation within twenty-four hours.
5. A verified petition seeking orders for maintenance,
support, custody, visitation, payment of rent, payment of
monetary compensation, possession of personal property,
100 prohibiting the transfer, encumbrance, or disposal of
101 property, or payment for services of a shelter for victims
102 of domestic violence, shall contain allegations relating to
103 those orders and shall pray for the orders desired.
104 [5.] 6. In making an award of custody, the court shall
105 consider all relevant factors including the presumption that
106 the best interests of the child will be served by placing
107 the child in the custody and care of the nonabusive parent,

SB 1747 29
108 unless there is evidence that both parents have engaged in
109 abusive behavior, in which case the court shall not consider
110 this presumption but may appoint a guardian ad litem or a
111 court-appointed special advocate to represent the children
112 in accordance with chapter 452 and shall consider all other
113 factors in accordance with chapter 452.
114 [6.] 7. The court shall grant to the noncustodial
115 parent rights to visitation with any minor child born to or
116 adopted by the parties, unless the court finds, after
117 hearing, that visitation would endanger the child's physical
118 health, impair the child's emotional development or would
119 otherwise conflict with the best interests of the child, or
120 that no visitation can be arranged which would sufficiently
121 protect the custodial parent from further domestic
122 violence. The court may appoint a guardian ad litem or
123 court-appointed special advocate to represent the minor
124 child in accordance with chapter 452 whenever the custodial
125 parent alleges that visitation with the noncustodial parent
126 will damage the minor child.
127 [7.] 8. The court shall make an order requiring the
128 noncustodial party to pay an amount reasonable and necessary
129 for the support of any child to whom the party owes a duty
130 of support when no prior order of support is outstanding and
131 after all relevant factors have been considered, in
132 accordance with Missouri supreme court rule 88.01 and
133 chapter 452.
134 [8.] 9. The court may grant a maintenance order to a
135 party for a period of time, not to exceed one hundred eighty
136 days. Any maintenance ordered by the court shall be in
137 accordance with chapter 452.
138 [9.] 10. (1) The court may, in order to ensure that a
139 petitioner can maintain an existing wireless telephone

SB 1747 30
140 number or numbers, issue an order, after notice and an
141 opportunity to be heard, directing a wireless service
142 provider to transfer the billing responsibility for and
143 rights to the wireless telephone number or numbers to the
144 petitioner, if the petitioner is not the wireless service
145 accountholder.
146 (2) (a) The order transferring billing responsibility
147 for and rights to the wireless telephone number or numbers
148 to the petitioner shall list the name and billing telephone
149 number of the accountholder, the name and contact
150 information of the person to whom the telephone number or
151 numbers will be transferred, and each telephone number to be
152 transferred to that person. The court shall ensure that the
153 contact information of the petitioner is not provided to the
154 accountholder in proceedings held under this chapter.
155 (b) Upon issuance, a copy of the full order of
156 protection shall be transmitted, either electronically or by
157 certified mail, to the wireless service provider's
158 registered agent listed with the secretary of state, or
159 electronically to the email address provided by the wireless
160 service provider. Such transmittal shall constitute
161 adequate notice for the wireless service provider acting
162 under this section and section 455.523.
163 (c) If the wireless service provider cannot
164 operationally or technically effectuate the order due to
165 certain circumstances, the wireless service provider shall
166 notify the petitioner within three business days. Such
167 circumstances shall include, but not be limited to, the
168 following:
169 a. The accountholder has already terminated the
170 account;

SB 1747 31
171 b. The differences in network technology prevent the
172 functionality of a device on the network; or
173 c. There are geographic or other limitations on
174 network or service availability.
175 (3) (a) Upon transfer of billing responsibility for
176 and rights to a wireless telephone number or numbers to the
177 petitioner under this subsection by a wireless service
178 provider, the petitioner shall assume all financial
179 responsibility for the transferred wireless telephone number
180 or numbers, monthly service costs, and costs for any mobile
181 device associated with the wireless telephone number or
182 numbers.
183 (b) This section shall not preclude a wireless service
184 provider from applying any routine and customary
185 requirements for account establishment to the petitioner as
186 part of this transfer of billing responsibility for a
187 wireless telephone number or numbers and any devices
188 attached to that number or numbers including, but not
189 limited to, identification, financial information, and
190 customer preferences.
191 (4) This section shall not affect the ability of the
192 court to apportion the assets and debts of the parties as
193 provided for in law, or the ability to determine the
194 temporary use, possession, and control of personal property.
195 (5) No cause of action shall lie against any wireless
196 service provider, its officers, employees, or agents, for
197 actions taken in accordance with the terms of a court order
198 issued under this section.
199 (6) As used in this section and section 455.523, a
200 "wireless service provider" means a provider of commercial
201 mobile service under Section 332(d) of the Federal

SB 1747 32
202 [Telecommunications Act of 1996] Communications Act of 1934
203 (47 U.S.C. Section [151, et seq.] 332).
455.523. 1. Any full order of protection granted
under sections 455.500 to 455.538 shall be to protect the
victim from domestic violence, including danger to the
child's pet, stalking, and sexual assault may include such
terms as the court reasonably deems necessary to ensure the
petitioner's safety, including but not limited to:
(1) Temporarily enjoining the respondent from
committing domestic violence or sexual assault, threatening
to commit domestic violence or sexual assault, stalking,
molesting, or disturbing the peace of the victim;
(2) Temporarily enjoining the respondent from entering
the family home of the victim, except as specifically
authorized by the court;
(3) Temporarily enjoining the respondent from
communicating with the victim in any manner or through any
medium, except as specifically authorized by the court.
2. (1) If the court issues, after a hearing for any
full order of protection, an order of protection, the court
may also:
(a) Prohibit the respondent from knowingly possessing
or purchasing any firearm while the order is in effect;
(b) Inform the respondent of such prohibition in
writing and, if the respondent is present, orally; and
(2) If the court prohibits the respondent from
possessing or purchasing any firearm pursuant to subdivision
(1) of this subsection, the court shall forward the order to
the Missouri state highway patrol so that the Missouri state
highway patrol can update the respondent's record in the
National Instant Criminal Background Check System (NICS).
Upon receiving an order under this subsection, the Missouri

SB 1747 33
state highway patrol shall notify the Federal Bureau of
Investigation within twenty-four hours.
3. When the court has, after hearing for any full
order of protection, issued an order of protection, it may,
in addition:
(1) Award custody of any minor child born to or
adopted by the parties when the court has jurisdiction over
such child and no prior order regarding custody is pending
or has been made, and the best interests of the child
require such order be issued;
(2) Award visitation;
(3) Award child support in accordance with supreme
court rule 88.01 and chapter 452;
(4) Award maintenance to petitioner when petitioner
and respondent are lawfully married in accordance with
chapter 452;
(5) Order respondent to make or to continue to make
rent or mortgage payments on a residence occupied by the
victim if the respondent is found to have a duty to support
the victim or other dependent household members;
(6) Order the respondent to participate in a court-
approved counseling program designed to help stop violent
behavior or to treat substance abuse;
(7) Order the respondent to pay, to the extent that he
or she is able, the costs of his or her treatment, together
with the treatment costs incurred by the victim;
(8) Order the respondent to pay a reasonable fee for
housing and other services that have been provided or that
are being provided to the victim by a shelter for victims of
domestic violence;
(9) Order a wireless service provider, in accordance
with the process, provisions, and requirements set out in

SB 1747 34
subdivisions (1) to (6) of subsection 9 of section 455.050,
to transfer the billing responsibility for and rights to the
wireless telephone number or numbers of any minor children
in the petitioner's care to the petitioner, if the
petitioner is not the wireless service accountholder;
(10) Award possession and care of any pet, along with
any moneys necessary to cover medical costs that may have
resulted from abuse of the pet.
565.076. 1. A person commits the offense of domestic
assault in the fourth degree if the act involves a domestic
victim, as the term "domestic victim" is defined under
section 565.002, and:
(1) The person attempts to cause or recklessly causes
physical injury, physical pain, or illness to such domestic
victim;
(2) With criminal negligence the person causes
physical injury to such domestic victim by means of a deadly
weapon or dangerous instrument;
(3) The person purposely places such domestic victim
in apprehension of immediate physical injury by any means;
(4) The person recklessly engages in conduct which
creates a substantial risk of death or serious physical
injury to such domestic victim;
(5) The person knowingly causes physical contact with
such domestic victim knowing he or she will regard the
contact as offensive; or
(6) The person knowingly attempts to cause or causes
the isolation of such domestic victim by unreasonably and
substantially restricting or limiting his or her access to
other persons, telecommunication devices or transportation
for the purpose of isolation.

SB 1747 35
2. The offense of domestic assault in the fourth
degree is a class [A misdemeanor] E felony, unless the
person has previously been found guilty of the offense of
domestic assault, of any assault offense under this chapter,
or of any offense against a domestic victim committed in
violation of any county or municipal ordinance in any state,
any state law, any federal law, or any military law which if
committed in this state two or more times would be a
violation of this section, in which case it is a class [E] D
felony. The offenses described in this subsection may be
against the same domestic victim or against different
domestic victims.
3. Upon a conviction for the offense of domestic
assault in the fourth degree, the court shall forward the
record of conviction to the Missouri state highway patrol so
that the Missouri state highway patrol can update the
respondent's record in the National Instant Criminal
Background Check System (NICS). Upon receiving a record
under this subsection, the Missouri state highway patrol
shall notify the Federal Bureau of Investigation within
twenty-four hours.
565.090. 1. A person commits the offense of
harassment in the first degree if he or she, without good
cause, engages in any act with the purpose to cause
emotional distress to another person, and such act does
cause such person to suffer emotional distress.
2. The offense of harassment in the first degree is a
class E felony, unless the defendant has previously been
found guilty of a violation of this section or section
565.091, or any offense committed in another jurisdiction
which, if committed in this state, would be chargeable or
indictable as a violation of any offense listed in this

SB 1747 36
section or section 565.091, in which case harassment in the
first degree is a class D felony.
3. This section shall not apply to activities of
federal, state, county, or municipal law enforcement
officers conducting investigations of violation of federal,
state, county, or municipal law.
565.091. 1. A person commits the offense of
harassment in the second degree if he or she, without good
cause, engages in any act with the purpose to cause
emotional distress to another person.
2. The offense of harassment in the second degree is a
class A misdemeanor, unless the [person has previously
pleaded guilty to or been found guilty of a violation of
this section, of any offense committed in violation of any
county or municipal ordinance in any state, any state law,
any federal law, or any military law which if committed in
this state would be chargeable or indictable as a violation
of any offense listed in this subsection, in which case it
is a class E felony] defendant has previously been found
guilty of a violation of this section or section 565.090, or
of any offense committed in another jurisdiction which, if
committed in this state, would be chargeable or indictable
as a violation of any offense listed in this section or
section 565.090, in which case harassment in the second
degree is a class E felony.
3. This section shall not apply to activities of
federal, state, county, or municipal law enforcement
officers conducting investigations of violations of federal,
state, county, or municipal law.
565.227. 1. A person commits the offense of stalking
in the second degree if he or she purposely, through his or

SB 1747 37
her course of conduct, disturbs, or follows with the intent
to disturb another person.
2. This section shall not apply to activities of
federal, state, county, or municipal law enforcement
officers conducting investigations of any violation of
federal, state, county, or municipal law.
3. Any law enforcement officer may arrest, without a
warrant, any person he or she has probable cause to believe
has violated the provisions of this section.
4. The offense of stalking in the second degree is a
class [A misdemeanor] E felony, unless the defendant has
previously been found guilty of a violation of this section
or section 565.225, or of any offense committed in another
jurisdiction which, if committed in this state, would be
chargeable or indictable as a violation of any offense
listed in this section or section 565.225, or unless the
victim is intentionally targeted as a law enforcement
officer, as defined in section 556.061, or the victim is
targeted because he or she is a relative within the second
degree of consanguinity or affinity to a law enforcement
officer, in which case stalking in the second degree is a
class [E] D felony.
5. Upon a conviction for the offense of stalking in
the second degree, the court shall forward the record of
conviction to the Missouri state highway patrol so that the
Missouri state highway patrol can update the respondent's
record in the National Instant Criminal Background Check
System (NICS). Upon receiving a record under this
subsection, the Missouri state highway patrol shall notify
the Federal Bureau of Investigation within twenty-four hours.
565.260. 1. Except as provided in subsection 2 of
this section, a person commits the offense of unlawful

SB 1747 38
tracking of a motor vehicle if the person knowingly
installs, conceals, or otherwise places an electronic
tracking device in or on a motor vehicle without the consent
of all owners of the vehicle for the purpose of monitoring
or following an occupant or occupants of the vehicle. As
used in this section, "person" does not include the
manufacturer of the motor vehicle.
2. (1) It shall not be an offense under this section
if the installing, concealing, or placing of an electronic
tracking device in or on a motor vehicle is by, or at the
direction of, a law enforcement officer in furtherance of a
criminal investigation and such investigation is carried out
in accordance with applicable state and federal law.
(2) It shall not be an offense under this section if
the installing, concealing, or placing of an electronic
tracking device in or on a motor vehicle is for the purpose
of tracking the location of stolen goods being transported
in the vehicle or for the purpose of tracking the location
of the vehicle if the motor vehicle is stolen.
(3) It shall not be an offense under this section if
the installing, concealing, or placing of an electronic
tracking device in or on a motor vehicle is by a legally
authorized representative of a vulnerable adult. As used in
this subdivision, "vulnerable adult" means any person
eighteen years of age or older who is impaired by reason of
mental illness, intellectual or developmental disability,
physical illness or disability, or other causes, including
age, to the extent the adult lacks sufficient understanding
or capacity to make, communicate, or carry out reasonable
decisions concerning his or her well-being or has one or
more limitations that substantially impair the adult's

SB 1747 39
ability to independently provide for his or her daily needs
or safeguard his or her person, property, or legal interests.
(4) If the installing, concealing, or placing of an
electronic tracking device in or on a motor vehicle is by,
or at the direction of, a person who obtains consent from
all owners of the vehicle, the installation, concealment, or
placement of the device in or on the vehicle shall not be an
offense under this section.
(5) It shall not be an offense under this section if
the installing, concealing, or placing of an electronic
tracking device in or on a motor vehicle is by a vehicle
rental, sharing, or leasing company that rents motor
vehicles for the purpose of tracking or managing the motor
vehicles owned by such company or providing services to
customers.
(6) It shall not be an offense under this section if
the installing, concealing, or placing of an electronic
tracking device in or on a motor vehicle is by a lienholder
or agent of a lienholder acting to track the movement or
location of a motor vehicle in order to repossess the motor
vehicle.
(7) It shall not be an offense under this section if
the installing, concealing, or placing of an electronic
tracking device in or on a motor vehicle is for any party to
participate in a voluntary usage-based insurance program.
"Voluntary usage-based insurance program" shall mean any
program implemented by, or on behalf of, an insurance
company that collects, records, or transmits information
relating to driving behavior of an insured party.
3. The provisions of this section shall not apply to a
tracking system installed by the manufacturer of a motor
vehicle.

SB 1747 40
4. The offense of unlawful tracking of a motor vehicle
is a class A misdemeanor for a first offense and a class E
felony for any second or subsequent offense.
565.400. 1. A person commits the offense of
cyberharassment if such person purposely or knowingly
engages in a threatening, aggressive, or otherwise fear-
inducing course of conduct by using digital technology,
internet service providers, electronic service providers, or
other electronic communications and devices that cause
reasonable fear, alarm, anxiety, undo stress, or terror to
others by repeated contact with no legitimate purpose.
2. The first offense of cyberharassment shall be a
class B misdemeanor. A second and any subsequent offense
shall be a class A misdemeanor.
565.405. 1. A person commits the offense of
cyberstalking if such person purposely or knowingly engages
in a threatening, aggressive, or otherwise fear-inducing
course of conduct by using digital technology, internet
service providers, electronic service providers, or other
electronic communications and devices to enhance the ability
to intimidate, track, follow, or cause reasonable fear,
alarm, anxiety, undo stress, or terror to another person.
2. The first offense of cyberstalking shall be a class
A misdemeanor. A second and any subsequent offense shall be
a class E felony.
571.070. 1. A person commits the offense of unlawful
possession of a firearm if such person knowingly has any
firearm in his or her possession and:
(1) Such person has been convicted of a felony under
the laws of this state, or of a crime under the laws of any
state or of the United States which, if committed within
this state, would be a felony; [or]

SB 1747 41
(2) Such person is a fugitive from justice, is
habitually in an intoxicated or drugged condition, or is
currently adjudged mentally incompetent;
(3) Such person has been convicted of a domestic
violence offense under the laws of this state, or of a crime
under the laws of any state or of the United States that, if
committed in this state, would be a domestic violence
offense; or
(4) Such person is subject to an order of protection
which prohibits the possession or purchasing of any firearm
granted under sections 455.010 to 455.095 or sections
455.500 to 455.538 that was issued after a hearing of which
the person had actual notice and at which the person had an
opportunity to participate or subject to an equivalent order
issued under the laws of another state or the United States.
2. Unlawful possession of a firearm is a class C
felony, unless a person has been convicted of a dangerous
felony as defined in section 556.061, or the person has a
prior conviction for unlawful possession of a firearm in
which case it is a class B felony.
3. The provisions of subdivision (1) of subsection 1
of this section shall not apply to the possession of an
antique firearm.
4. As used in this section, "misdemeanor offense of
domestic violence" means:
(1) Domestic assault in the fourth degree under
section 565.076;
(2) Stalking in the second degree under section
565.227;
(3) Cyberstalking under section 565.405; or
(4) Any misdemeanor offense committed by a family or
household member of the victim as defined in section 455.010

SB 1747 42
that involves the use or attempted use of physical force or
the threatened use of a deadly weapon.
573.570. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Depicted individual", an individual who, as a
result of digitization or by means of digital manipulation,
appears in whole or in part in an intimate digital depiction
and who is identifiable by virtue of the individual's face,
likeness, or other distinguishing characteristic, such as a
unique birthmark or other recognizable feature, or from
information displayed in connection with the digital
depiction;
(2) "Digital depiction", a realistic visual depiction
of an individual that has been created or altered using
digital manipulation;
(3) "Information content providers", any person or
entity that is responsible, in whole or in part, for the
creation or development of information provided through the
internet or any other interactive computer service;
(4) "Intimate digital depiction", a digital depiction
of an individual that has been created or altered using
digital manipulation and that depicts:
(a) The uncovered genitals, pubic area, anus, or
postpubescent female nipple of an identifiable individual;
(b) The display or transfer of bodily sexual fluids:
a. Onto any part of the body of an identifiable
individual; or
b. From the body of an identifiable individual; or
(c) An identifiable individual engaging in sexually
explicit conduct;
(5) "Sexually explicit conduct", actual or simulated:

SB 1747 43
(a) Sexual intercourse, including genital-genital,
oral-genital, anal-genital, or oral-anal, whether between
persons of the same or opposite sex;
(b) Bestiality;
(c) Masturbation;
(d) Sadistic or masochistic abuse; or
(e) Lascivious exhibition of the genitals or pubic
area of any person.
2. A person commits the offense of disclosure of an
intimate digital depiction if the person:
(1) Discloses an intimate digital depiction:
(a) With the intent to harass, annoy, threaten, alarm,
or cause substantial harm to the finances or reputation of
the depicted individual; or
(b) With the actual knowledge that, or reckless
disregard for whether, such disclosure will cause physical,
emotional, reputational, or economic harm to the depicted
individual; or
(2) Threatens to disclose an intimate digital
depiction:
(a) With the intent to harass, annoy, threaten, alarm,
or cause substantial harm to the finances or reputation of
the depicted individual; or
(b) With the actual knowledge that, or reckless
disregard for whether, such threatened disclosure will cause
physical, emotional, reputational, or economic harm to the
depicted individual.
3. (1) A violation of subdivision (1) of subsection 2
of this section shall be a class D felony.
(2) A violation of subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of
this section shall be a class E felony.

SB 1747 44
(3) A violation of subdivision (1) of subsection 2 of
this section shall be a class C felony if:
(a) The violation is a second or other subsequent
violation of subdivision (1) of subsection 2 of this
section; or
(b) The violation is such that the digital depiction
could be reasonably expected to:
a. Affect the conduct of any administrative,
legislative, or judicial proceeding of a federal, state,
local, or tribal government agency, including the
administration of an election or the conduct of foreign
relations; or
b. Facilitate violence.
(4) A violation of subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of
this section shall be a class D felony if:
(a) The violation is a second or other subsequent
violation of subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of this
section; or
(b) The violation is such that the digital depiction
could be reasonably expected to affect the conduct of any
administrative, legislative, or judicial proceeding of a
federal, state, local, or tribal government agency,
including the administration of an election or the conduct
of foreign relations.
4. It shall not be a defense to an offense of
disclosure of an intimate digital depiction under this
section that there is a disclaimer stating that the intimate
digital depiction of the depicted individual was
unauthorized or that the depicted individual did not
participate in the creation or development of the digital
depiction.

SB 1747 45
5. For the purposes of this section, a provider of an
interactive computer service shall not be held to have
committed the offense of disclosure of an intimate digital
depiction due to:
(1) Any action voluntarily taken in good faith to
restrict access to or availability of intimate digital
depictions; or
(2) Any action taken to enable or make available to
100 information content providers or other persons the technical
101 means to restrict access to intimate digital depictions.
573.575. 1. A person commits the offense of sadistic
online exploitation if he or she:
(1) Uses the internet to manipulate, intimidate, hurt,
scare, control, or threaten a victim to undergo suffering
through forcing their submission, use of violence, self-
harm, or destruction for sadistic or sinister purposes;
(2) Coerces a victim into performing self-harm, animal
harm, or harm to another person;
(3) Uses nonphysical forms of coercion, manipulation,
shame, or fear to extort another person into providing
sexually explicit content then using such content to further
extort, threaten, or control the victim; or
(4) Uses intimate depictions as devices to threaten or
coerce a victim by demanding any kind of financial gain.
2. The offense of sadistic online exploitation shall
be a class E felony. If bodily harm or injury occurs, this
offense shall be a class D felony.
589.660. As used in sections 589.660 to 589.681, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Address", a residential street address, school
address, or work address of a person, as specified on the
person's application to be a program participant;

SB 1747 46
(2) "Application assistant", an employee or volunteer
of a government agency, or of a nonprofit program that
provides counseling, referral, shelter, or other specialized
service to victims of domestic violence, rape, sexual
assault, human trafficking, stalking, cyberstalking,
harassment, cyberharassment, or other crimes who has been
designated by the respective agency or program, and who has
been trained and registered by the secretary of state to
assist individuals in the completion of program
participation applications;
(3) "Designated address", the address assigned to a
program participant by the secretary;
(4) "Mailing address", an address that is recognized
for delivery by the United States Postal Service;
(5) "Program", the address confidentiality program
established in section 589.663;
(6) "Program participant", a person certified by the
secretary of state as eligible to participate in the address
confidentiality program;
(7) "Secretary", the secretary of state.
589.663. There is created in the office of the
secretary of state a program to be known as the "Address
Confidentiality Program" to protect victims of domestic
violence, rape, sexual assault, human trafficking, stalking,
cyberstalking, harassment, cyberharassment, or other crimes
who fear for their safety, as well as the safety of
individuals residing in the same household as the victim, by
authorizing the use of designated addresses for such
victims, their minor children, and individuals residing with
them. The program shall be administered by the secretary
under the following application and certification procedures:

SB 1747 47
(1) An adult person, a parent or guardian acting on
behalf of a minor, or a guardian acting on behalf of an
incapacitated person may apply to the secretary to have a
designated address assigned by the secretary to serve as the
person's address or the address of the minor or
incapacitated person;
(2) The secretary may approve an application if it is
filed with the office of the secretary in the manner
established by rule and on a form prescribed by the
secretary. A completed application shall contain:
(a) The date the application was prepared, the
applicant's signature, and the signature and registration
number of the application assistant who assisted the
applicant in applying to be a program participant;
(b) A designation of the secretary as agent for
purposes of service of process and for receipt of first
class mail, legal documents, and certified mail;
(c) A statement that the applicant has good reason to
believe that he or she:
a. Is a victim or resides in the same household as a
victim; and
b. Fears future harm;
(d) A mailing address where the applicant may be
contacted by the secretary or a designee and the telephone
number or numbers where the applicant may be called by the
secretary or the secretary's designee; and
(e) One or more addresses that the applicant requests
not be disclosed for the reason that disclosure will
jeopardize the applicant's safety or increase the risk of
violence to the applicant or members of the applicant's
household;

SB 1747 48
(3) Upon receipt of a completed application, the
secretary may certify the applicant as a program
participant. A program participant is certified for four
years following the date of initial certification unless the
certification is withdrawn by the applicant or cancelled by
the secretary before that date. The secretary shall send
notification of an expiring certification and a renewal form
to a program participant at least four weeks prior to the
expiration of the program participant's certification. The
renewal need only be signed by the applicant and need not be
made before an application assistant;
(4) The secretary shall forward first class mail,
legal documents, and certified mail to the appropriate
program participants;
(5) This section shall be liberally construed as to
not hold omissions by the secretary against participants or
applicants.
590.040. 1. The POST commission shall set the minimum
number of hours of basic training for licensure as a peace
officer no lower than six hundred, with the following
exceptions:
(1) Up to one thousand hours may be mandated for any
class of license required for commission by a state law
enforcement agency;
(2) As few as one hundred twenty hours may be mandated
for any class of license restricted to commission as a
reserve peace officer with police powers limited to the
commissioning political subdivision;
(3) Persons validly licensed on August 28, 2001, may
retain licensure without additional basic training;
(4) Persons licensed and commissioned within a county
of the third classification before July 1, 2002, may retain

SB 1747 49
licensure with one hundred twenty hours of basic training if
the commissioning political subdivision has adopted an order
or ordinance to that effect;
(5) Persons serving as a reserve officer on August 27,
2001, within a county of the first classification or a
county with a charter form of government and with more than
one million inhabitants on August 27, 2001, having
previously completed a minimum of one hundred sixty hours of
training, shall be granted a license necessary to function
as a reserve peace officer only within such county. For the
purposes of this subdivision, the term "reserve officer"
shall mean any person who serves in a less than full-time
law enforcement capacity, with or without pay and who,
without certification, has no power of arrest and who,
without certification, must be under the direct and
immediate accompaniment of a certified peace officer of the
same agency at all times while on duty; and
(6) The POST commission shall provide for the
recognition of basic training received at law enforcement
training centers of other states, the military, the federal
government and territories of the United States regardless
of the number of hours included in such training and shall
have authority to require supplemental training as a
condition of eligibility for licensure.
2. The director shall have the authority to limit any
exception provided in subsection 1 of this section to
persons remaining in the same commission or transferring to
a commission in a similar jurisdiction.
3. The basic training of every peace officer, except
agents of the conservation commission, shall include at
least thirty hours of training in the investigation and
management of cases involving domestic and family violence.

SB 1747 50
Such training shall include instruction, specific to
domestic and family violence cases, regarding: report
writing; physical abuse, sexual abuse, child fatalities and
child neglect; interviewing children and alleged
perpetrators; the nature, extent and causes of domestic and
family violence; the safety of victims, other family and
household members and investigating officers; legal rights
and remedies available to victims, including rights to
compensation and the enforcement of civil and criminal
remedies; services available to victims and their children;
the effects of cultural, racial and gender bias in law
enforcement; and state statutes. Said curriculum shall be
developed and presented in consultation with the department
of health and senior services, the children's division,
public and private providers of programs for victims of
domestic and family violence, persons who have demonstrated
expertise in training and education concerning domestic and
family violence, and the Missouri coalition against domestic
violence.
4. The basic training of every peace officer first
licensed on or after August 28, 2027, shall include at least
six hours of training concerning the prohibition against
racial profiling and such training shall promote
understanding and respect for racial and cultural
differences and the use of effective, noncombative methods
for carrying out law enforcement duties in a racially and
culturally diverse environment. Such training shall include
two hours of racial profiling training, two hours of
implicit bias training, and two hours of de-escalation
training.
5. The basic training of every peace officer first
licensed on or after August 28, 2027, shall include at least

SB 1747 51
four hours of training specific to stalking, harassment,
cyberstalking and cyberharassment, the safety of victims,
legal rights and remedies available to victims, including
the civil and criminal remedies, and resources and services
available to victims.
595.205. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Cybercrime Survivors' Bill of Rights". These
rights shall be in addition to other rights as designated by
law and no person shall discourage a person from exercising
these rights. For the purposes of this section, "cybercrime
survivor" means any person who may be a victim of
cyberharassment or cyberstalking who presents themselves to
an appropriate law enforcement officer, prosecuting
attorney, or court.
2. A cybercrime survivor retains all the rights of
this section regardless of whether a criminal investigation
or prosecution results or if the survivor has previously
waived any of these rights. A cybercrime survivor has the
right to:
(1) Consult with an employee or volunteer of a crisis
center specializing in victim care and advocacy;
(2) Request to be interviewed by a law enforcement
officer of the gender of the survivor's choosing, when there
is an available appropriate law enforcement official of the
gender of the survivor's choosing;
(3) An interpreter who can communicate in the language
of the survivor's choice, as is reasonably available, in a
timely manner;
(4) Notification of basic rights afforded and
resources available to victims of cybercrimes;
(5) Notification about change in placement of
incarceration of the perpetrator;

SB 1747 52
(6) Be free from intimidation, harassment, and abuse
in any related criminal or civil proceeding and the right to
reasonable protection from the offender or any person acting
on behalf of the offender from harm and threats of harm
arising out of the survivor's disclosure.
3. An appropriate crisis care provider, law
enforcement officer, and prosecuting attorney shall provide
the cybercrime survivor with notification of the rights of
survivors pursuant to subsection 2 of this section in a
timely manner. Each appropriate crisis care provider, law
enforcement officer, and prosecuting attorney shall ensure
that the cybercrime survivor has been notified of these
rights.
4. The department of public safety, with the advice of
the attorney general, shall develop forms and procedures for
gathering, transmitting, and storing evidence related to
cyberharassment, cyberstalking, harassment, and stalking
offenses.
5. The department of public safety shall develop a
document in collaboration with Missouri-based stakeholders.
Missouri-based stakeholders shall include, but not be
limited to, the following:
(1) Prosecuting attorneys;
(2) Chief law enforcement officers or their designees;
(3) Appropriate medical providers, as defined in
section 595.220;
(4) Representatives of the statewide coalition against
domestic and sexual violence;
(5) The director of the Missouri state highway patrol
crime lab or their designee; and
(6) Representatives of a statewide association
representing Missouri hospitals.

SB 1747 53
6. The document required in subsection 4 of this
section shall include the following:
(1) A description of the rights of the cybercrime
survivor pursuant to this section; and
(2) Telephone and internet means for contacting a
crisis center specializing in victim care and advocacy.
The department of public safety shall provide this document
in clear language that is comprehensible to a person
proficient in English and shall provide this document in any
other foreign language spoken by at least five percent of
the population in any county or city not within a county in
Missouri.
595.400. 1. There is hereby created the "Elder Abuse
Task Force" to consist of the following members:
(1) The director of the department health and senior
services or his or her designee;
(2) Four members of the general assembly:
(a) Two members of the senate, with one member to be
appointed by the president pro tempore of the senate and one
member to be appointed by the minority floor leader of the
senate; and
(b) Two members of the house of representatives, with
one member to be appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives and one member to be appointed by the
minority floor leader of the house of representatives;
(3) Two members with law enforcement backgrounds and
experience with elder abuse appointed by the director of the
department of public safety;
(4) A representative of the Missouri Association of
Prosecuting Attorneys appointed by the president of the
Missouri Association of Prosecuting Attorneys;

SB 1747 54
(5) Two financial fraud experts appointed by the
governor;
(6) Two elder advocates appointed by the governor;
(7) One member appointed by the department of health
and senior services director with knowledge of the master
plan on aging;
(8) One member from the Missouri Council on Aging
appointed by their board president;
(9) One member from Missouri's Area Agencies on Aging
appointed by the Missouri Association of Area Agencies on
Aging.
2. The task force shall appoint a chairperson who is
elected by a majority vote of the members of the task
force. The task force shall have an initial meeting before
October 1, 2026. The members of the task force shall serve
without compensation, but shall be entitled to necessary and
actual expenses incurred in attending meetings of the task
force.
3. The task force shall examine and make
recommendations on including but not limited to:
(1) Romance scams, elder financial exploitation, cyber
harassment, and digital abuse;
(2) Educational and any other resources deemed
necessary by the task force to educate and inform victims
and the public on ways to protect themselves;
(3) Measures necessary to address and reduce elder
abuse; and
(4) Measures to help victims and victims' families
prevent and heal from elder abuse.
595.450. 1. (1) There is hereby created in the state
treasury the "Digital Victim Assistance and Awareness Fund",
which shall consist of moneys collected under subsection 2

SB 1747 55
this section and any gifts, donations, bequests, or
appropriations. The state treasurer shall be custodian of
the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180,
the state treasurer may approve disbursements. Upon
appropriation, money in the fund shall be used solely for
public awareness and education on cybercrimes.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080
to the contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the end
of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the
fund in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any
interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
2. In criminal cases involving violations of sections
565.090, 565.091, 565.225, 565.227, 565.400, 565.405,
573.570, or 573.575, there shall be assessed as costs a
surcharge in the amount of fifteen dollars. No such
surcharge shall be collected in any proceeding involving a
violation of an ordinance or state law when the proceeding
or defendant has been dismissed by the court or when costs
are to be paid by the state, county, or municipality. Such
surcharge shall be collected and disbursed by the clerk of
the court as provided by sections 488.010 to 488.020. The
surcharge collected pursuant to this section shall be paid
into the state treasury to the credit of the digital victim
assistance and awareness fund created in this section.
✓